Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Department of Health
§ 9-2-123.
Wyoming investment in nursing loan and grant program; eligibility criteria; procedures.

There is created the Wyoming investment in nursing program administered by the Wyoming community college commission created under W.S.

21-18-201

. The program shall be known as the WYIN program. Applicants shall be residents of this state or graduates of a Wyoming high school and may apply for loans from the WYIN program in accordance with this section.

To qualify for a loan under the WYIN program, the applicant shall first:

Be accepted into a nursing education program at a Wyoming community college, the University of Wyoming, or, in the case of a candidate for a doctoral degree, an institution providing the required nursing education courses under contract with the western interstate commission for higher education or in a distance nursing education program at a university that is regionally accredited; and

Apply for federal financial assistance and any employer-based financial assistance for which the applicant may be eligible. Wyoming community colleges shall allow students who apply for admission into an approved nurse aide training or nursing education program, and who will enroll in fewer than six (6) academic credit hours, to apply for federal financial assistance.

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this program, loans under the WYIN program may be granted to applicants enrolled or planning to enroll in nursing education programs as follows:

An applicant who is accepted into a Wyoming licensed practical nurse or registered nursing education program or a baccalaureate degree program in nursing may be eligible for a loan to pay the unmet need, as determined by the Wyoming community college commission or its designee, of attendance at the licensed practical nursing education program or the registered nursing education program leading to an associate’s or baccalaureate degree;

A registered nurse with a baccalaureate degree who holds an unencumbered license with the Wyoming board of nursing and is accepted into a nursing education program at the University of Wyoming leading to a master’s degree or doctorate level degree in nursing or nursing education may be eligible for a loan to pay the unmet need of attendance, as determined by the Wyoming community college commission or its designee, provided that in order to receive a loan for either program, the applicant shall agree to repay the loan by teaching nursing at a Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming. If the applicant registered nurse is not accepted into a nursing education program at the University of Wyoming and upon approval of the Wyoming community college commission, the applicant registered nurse may be accepted into an accredited nursing education program at a university located outside of the state. Loans awarded for applicants accepted into programs outside of Wyoming shall not exceed the loan amounts available for programs at the University of Wyoming;

A registered nurse with a master’s degree in nursing who holds an unencumbered license with the Wyoming board of nursing and is accepted into a nursing education program at an institution providing the required nursing education courses under contract with the western interstate commission for higher education or in a distance nursing education program at a university that is regionally accredited leading to a doctorate level degree in nursing may be eligible for a loan to pay the unmet need of attendance, as determined by the Wyoming community college commission or its designee, provided that in order to receive a loan for a doctorate level degree program, the applicant shall agree to repay the loan by teaching nursing at a Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming.

A loan provided under this section shall not exceed the cost of attendance for the approved program, reduced by the amount of any Pell or other federal grant and any employer-based financial assistance received by the applicant.

A recipient of a WYIN loan under this section may repay the loan without cash payment by working in Wyoming as a nurse or nurse educator as provided in subsection (f) of this section. To qualify as repayment under this subsection, and except for graduate students as provided under subsection (q) of this section, work shall be performed within the following time periods which begin with the calendar month following the month in which the student completed the academic program:

If the loan can be repaid with work of two (2) years or less, within three (3) years;

If the loan can be repaid with work of greater than two (2) years, but no more than four (4) years, within five (5) years;

If the loan can be repaid with work of greater than four (4) years, within the amount of time the loan could be repaid, plus two (2) years.

Qualified work under subsection (e) of this section shall be credited so that the student’s loan balance is reduced on the basis of one (1) year of full-time employment repaying the loan balance for one (1) academic year of full-time enrollment, or twelve thousand dollars ($12,000.00) of the loan, whichever is less. Qualified work shall be credited on a proportional basis.

Any recipient of a WYIN loan who fails:

To complete the academic program for which the loan was provided shall commence cash repayment of the loan no later than forty-five (45) days after the recipient leaves the academic program;

To obtain employment in the targeted occupation for which the person received the education within ninety (90) days after successfully passing the appropriate certification or licensure examination shall commence cash repayment of the loan within one hundred twenty (120) days after successfully passing the appropriate certification or licensure examination;

The appropriate certification or licensure examination on the first attempt may retake the examination at the next available opportunity before commencing repayment of the loan. The recipient shall notify the Wyoming community college commission or its contractor of the intent to retake the examination and the date the examination will be taken. Any recipient of a WYIN loan who fails the examination after the second attempt shall commence cash repayment of the loan within forty-five (45) days after receipt of notification of the second failure by the board of nursing. If the recipient of a WYIN loan who fails the examination on the first attempt does not retake the examination at the next available opportunity, cash repayment shall commence within forty-five (45) days after the next available examination is conducted.

Loan repayment options under this section may be deferred for a period not to exceed four (4) years while a loan recipient is serving on full-time active duty with any branch of the military services of the United States.

The Wyoming community college commission shall have the powers and duties specified in W.S.

21-18-202

to implement this section and shall establish terms and conditions of loans issued under this section, including:

Interest rates and loan terms;

The form and process for loan application, review and award;

Criteria under which students may be relieved from having to repay loans and interest thereon, in whole or in part, where the requirement to repay would cause undue hardship.

Funding of the loan program established under this section shall be by appropriation of the legislature. The Wyoming community college commission shall transfer approved loan amounts to the University of Wyoming and to Wyoming community colleges at which loan recipients are enrolled. In consultation with the university and affected community colleges, the commission shall establish procedures for transferring loan amounts and for reporting requirements on the expenditure of transferred loan amounts.

Cash repayment of loans and interest thereon shall be credited to the general fund.

The Wyoming community college commission shall annually review the loan program established under this section and report to the governor and the legislature in accordance with W.S.

9-2-1014

, regarding program results, funds received and loans issued during the preceding academic year, together with the status of all outstanding loan commitments and repayments under the program.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 60, § 2.

For the purposes of this section:

Any person beginning a nursing education program as authorized by this section shall continue to receive funding for the program so long as the person remains eligible as required by this section;

Repayment of loans provided under this section shall continue as specified in this section until all loan obligations have been satisfied.

A recipient of a WYIN loan under this section and attending a master’s or doctorate nursing level program may begin loan repayment through qualified work as authorized under subsections (e) and (f) of this section concurrently with enrollment in the nursing education program, subject to the following:

If the recipient is enrolled in a master’s nursing degree program, the recipient shall perform qualified work for not less than one (1) year following completion of the education program;

If the recipient is enrolled in a doctorate nursing degree program, the recipient shall perform qualified work for not less than two (2) years following completion of the education program.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 90, § 1; 2005, ch. 187, § 1; 2010, ch. 102, § 1; 2015 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 60, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “community college commission” for “higher education assistance authority” and “Wyoming community college commission” for “authority” throughout the section; in (a), substituted “W.S.

21-18-201

” for “W.S.

21-16-703

”; in (c)(ii), inserted “with preference given to a registered nurse currently teaching at the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming college,” “the registered nurse,” and the last sentence; in (e), inserted “and except for graduate students as provided under subsection (q) of this section”; in (j), substituted “W.S.

21-18-202

” for “W.S.

21-16-705

”; and added (q).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (o), substituted “June 30, 2016” for “June 30, 2011.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (c), deleted “has the equivalent of at least one (1) year of full-time service teaching in a nursing education program in Wyoming as a registered nurse with a baccalaureate degree, with preference given to a registered nurse currently teaching at the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming college” following “Wyoming board of nursing,” deleted “the registered nurse” preceding “is accepted,” added “or doctorate level degree”, substituted “either” for “a master’s degree,” and “teaching nursing at a Wyoming community college” for “teaching at a Wyoming college” in (ii); deleted “has the equivalent of at least one (1) year of full-time service teaching in a nursing education program in Wyoming as a registered nurse with a master's degree in nursing” following “Wyoming board of nursing,” and added “nursing” and “a Wyoming community college or” at the end of (iii); and in (o), substituted “2020” for “2016”.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in(q)(i), substituted “than” for “that” following “not less.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (p), substituted “For the purposes of” for “Notwithstanding subsection (o) of.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 60, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (o), which read: “This program created by this section shall expire effective June 30, 2020.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2003, ch. 85, § 1, and ch. 90, § 1, both added a §

9-2-123

. The provisions added by ch. 85 have been redesignated as §

9-2-124

at the direction of the legislative service office.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 311(d) provides that, notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a), any unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the community college commission in 2003 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 90, Section 3(b) for the purposes of implementing W.S. 21-18-202(c)(vii) shall not revert on June 30, 2004, and are hereby appropriated to the Wyoming Higher Education Authority to implement the provisions of W.S.

9-2-123

for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 311(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

Laws 2005, ch. 247, § 2, appropriates $400,000 from the school foundation program account to the Wyoming higher education assistance authority to implement the act. Not more than five percent (5%) of that amount may be used by the Wyoming higher education assistance authority for administration of the program, including expenses of the authority and loan administration fees. Section 2 further provides that if responsibility for administration of the Wyoming investment in nursing program under W.S.

9-2-123

is transferred to another state agency by enactment of legislation adopted during the 2005 general session, the appropriation under this section is transferred to that successor agency and the administration of the Wyoming teacher shortage loan repayment program is to be transferred to that successor agency, as well.

Laws 2005, ch. 247, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2005.

§ 9-2-124.
Prescription drug consumer information and technical assistance program.

The prescription drug consumer information and technical assistance program is created within the department of health. The program shall provide Wyoming residents with advice on the prudent use of prescription drugs and how to access government and private prescription drug programs and discounts. The program shall include consultation by licensed pharmacists for individuals with respect to how the individuals may, with the approval of the appropriate prescribing health care professional, avoid dangerous drug interactions and substitute more cost effective drugs for the drugs prescribed.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 85, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Drug Donation Program Act, see §

35-7-1601

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 85, § 1, and ch. 90, § 1, both added a §

9-2-123

. The provisions added by ch. 85 have been redesignated as §

9-2-124

at the direction of the legislative services office.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 310, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates $20,000 from the general fund to the legislative service office to fund the preparation of two annual prescription drug cost containment reports. The department of health and legislative service office research staff are each to prepare a cost/benefit report on the savings realized and direct and indirect costs incurred in the implementation of any prescription drug cost-containment measure including but not limited to a preferred drug list, prior authorization, refill too soon program, lock-in program for narcotics, state maximum allowable cost program, or quantity limitations. The report will assess all therapeutic prescription drug classes that are currently subject to prior authorization and incorporate all prescription drug programs administered by the state. Costs and savings should include consideration of the following: (1) direct costs such as staffing, contracts and other resources used; (2) cost shifting to physicians in terms of added time spent in obtaining authorization for a selected course of therapy; (3) internal program cost shifting, including but not limited to additional prescriptions, laboratory tests, physician visits, hospitalization, and skilled nursing care that are associated with the implementation of the prior authorization program; (4) discussion of qualitative costs and benefits experienced by patients; and (5) direct state and federal prescription drug expenditure savings. The legislative service office and the department of health shall collectively agree upon the necessary data to be collected but the department of health will be solely responsible for all data collection as well as any related expenditures for data collection and preparation of the department's annual report. The legislative service office and the department of health will include recommendations for improvement of this evaluation process as a part of each annual report. The department of health and the legislative service office shall separately report their annual findings of this study to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by December 1, 2004 and October 31, 2005.

§ 9-2-125.
Client treatment records; confidentiality; limited disclosure permitted; definitions.

Client registration records and treatment records relating to persons receiving mental health or substance abuse treatment at a treatment facility under contract with the department shall remain confidential, except as provided in this section, W.S. 7-4-201(f),

28-8-107

,

28-8-108

and

28-8-111

.

The content of any record specified in subsection (a) of this section may be disclosed in accordance with the prior written consent of the person who is the subject of the record, but only to the extent, under the circumstances, and for the purposes as are allowed under the terms of the written consent.

The records specified in subsection (a) of this section shall be provided by the treatment facility or by another division within the department to the mental health division or the substance abuse division for the purpose of determining compliance with state or federal requirements and as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism or drug abuse.

Treatment records of a person may be released without informed written consent of the patient or his legal representative in the following circumstances:

To an agency as necessary for management or financial audits, or program monitoring and evaluation. Information obtained under this paragraph shall remain confidential and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or other identifying information about the persons whose records are being released;

For purposes of research as provided in W.S.

9-2-126

. Information obtained under this paragraph shall remain confidential and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or other identifying information about the persons whose records are being released;

Within the treatment facility where the client is receiving treatment as necessary for the provision of mental health or substance abuse services;

To a licensed physician or a licensed health care provider who has determined that the life or health of the client is in danger and that treatment without the information contained in the treatment records could be injurious to the client’s health. Disclosure under this paragraph shall be limited to the portions of the records necessary to meet the medical emergency;

To a treatment facility that is to receive the client from another treatment facility. The release of records under this subsection shall be limited to the treatment records required by law and those treatment records as necessary for the provision of mental health and substance abuse services;

To a correctional facility, the board of parole, a corrections employee or contractor who is responsible for the supervision of a person who is receiving mental health or substance abuse services. Release of records under this paragraph is limited to and as follows:

An evaluation report provided pursuant to a written supervision plan;

The discharge summary, including a record or summary of all somatic treatments, at the termination of any treatment provided as part of the supervision plan;

When a person is returned from a treatment facility to a correctional facility or when a person under the supervision of the department of corrections is receiving mental health or substance abuse services from a treatment facility, the information provided under paragraph (v) of this subsection. Disclosure under this paragraph shall be made to clinical staff only;

Any information necessary to establish or implement changes in the person’s treatment plan or the level or kind of supervision as determined by the department of corrections, the contractor or the board of parole. In cases involving a person transferred back to a correctional facility, disclosure under this paragraph shall be made to clinical staff only.

To the person’s legal representative or guardian ad litem, without modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals or other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment or patient’s rights;

Pursuant to lawful search warrant or other order issued by a court.

The department shall develop and maintain an information system to be used by the department and its divisions that includes a tracking method which allows the department and its divisions to identify mental health and substance abuse clients’ participation in any mental health or substance abuse services on an immediate basis. The information system shall not include individual client’s case history files. Confidentiality of client information shall be maintained to avoid identification of individual clients. The data elements shall be designed to provide information that is needed to measure performance and achieve service outcomes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, as established by rule and regulation of the department.

As used in W.S.

9-2-125

and

9-2-126

:

“Department” means the department of health;

“Individually identifiable” means that a record contains information which reveals or can likely be associated with the identity of the person or persons to whom the record pertains;

“Legal representative” means a person legally authorized to give consent for the disclosure of personal records on behalf of a minor or a legally incompetent adult;

“Registration records” means the records of the department, treatment facilities and other persons providing treatment services under contract with the department which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time have received treatment services for mental illness or substance abuse with monies provided under contract with the department;

“Research” means a planned and systematic sociological, psychological, epidemiological or other scientific investigation carried out by a state agency, by a scientific research professional with a bona fide scientific research organization or by a graduate student currently enrolled in an academic degree curriculum, with an objective to contribute to scientific knowledge, the solution to health problems or the evaluation of public benefit and service programs. “Research” does not include record analysis and data collection that are subjective, do not permit replication and are not designed to yield reliable and valid results;

“Treatment facility” means any community based program or service provider providing mental health or substance abuse services under contract with the department;

“Treatment records” means registration, health care and all other records, in any form or medium, concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received mental health or substance abuse services from a treatment facility or other persons under contract with the department.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 76, § 1; 2019 ch. 78, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), deleted "and

35-2-605

through

35-2-617

" and made related changes.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 76, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 21, 2007.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 216, §
3, provides:

“(a)

Only if 2007 House Bill 0133, departmentof health client information sharing, is enacted into law, there isappropriated three hundred sixty-three thousand two hundred dollars($363,200.00) in one-time funding, or as much thereof as necessary,from the general fund to the department of health as follows:

“(i)

For the period beginning with the effectivedate of this act and ending June 30, 2007, there is appropriated fortythousand dollars ($40,000.00) to the department of health. The fundsappropriated under this paragraph shall be used to enable the mentalhealth division and the substance abuse division to continue developingthe client information system database, including compilation andconversion of client data as necessary for fiscal years 2005 through2007, to implement 2007 House Bill 0133;

“(ii)

For the fiscal year beginning July 1,2007 and ending June 30, 2008, there is appropriated one hundred sixty-onethousand six hundred dollars ($161,600.00) to the mental health divisionto finalize the client information system database, to compile andprocess client information data through fiscal year 2008 and to distributefunding to community mental health providers under contract with thedivision as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

“(iii)

For the fiscal year beginning July 1,2007 and ending June 30, 2008, there is appropriated one hundred sixty-onethousand six hundred dollars ($161,600.00) to the substance abusedivision to finalize the client information system database, to compileand process client information data through fiscal year 2008 and todistribute funding to community substance abuse treatment providersunder contract with the division as provided in paragraph (iv) ofthis subsection;

“(iv)

Of the funds appropriated under paragraphs(ii) and (iii) of this subsection, not more than one hundred twentythousand dollars ($120,000.00) shall be distributed to community mentalhealth and substance abuse treatment providers under contract withthe division of mental health or the division of substance abuse toconform client data and submit the client data for inclusion in theclient information system developed by the department of health.

“This act is effectiveimmediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to becomelaw as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2007.”

§ 9-2-126.
Client treatment records; research; access; disclosure; penalties.

The department may authorize or provide access to or provide copies of an individually identifiable record for research purposes if informed written consent for the disclosure has been given to the department by the person to whom the record pertains or, in the case of minors and legally incompetent adults, the person’s legal representative.

The department may authorize or provide access to or provide copies of an individually identifiable record it has in its control or the registration or treatment records of a treatment facility for research purposes without the informed consent of the person to whom the record pertains or the person’s legally authorized representative, only if:

The department adopts research review and approval rules including, but not limited to, the requirement that the research organization appoints a standing human research review board competent to review research proposals as to ethical and scientific soundness and the review board determines that the disclosure request has scientific merit and is of importance in terms of the agency’s program concerns, that the research purposes cannot be reasonably accomplished without disclosure of the information in individually identifiable form and without waiver of the informed consent of the person to whom the record pertains or the person’s legal representative, that disclosure risks have been minimized, and that remaining risks are outweighed by anticipated health, safety or scientific benefits;

The disclosure does not violate federal law or regulations; and

The department negotiates with the research organization receiving the records or record information a written and legally binding confidentiality agreement prior to disclosure. The agreement shall:

Establish specific safeguards to assure the continued confidentiality and security of individually identifiable records or record information;

Ensure that the research organization will report or publish research findings and conclusions in a manner that does not permit identification of the person whose record was used for the research. Final research reports or publications shall not include photographs or other visual representations contained in personal records;

Establish that the research professional will destroy the individual identifiers associated with the records or record information as soon as the purposes of the research project have been accomplished and notify the department to this effect in writing;

Prohibit any subsequent disclosure of the records or record information in individually identifiable form except as provided in subsection (c) of this section; and

Provide for the signature of the research professional, of any of the research professional’s team members who require access to the information in identified form, and of the department official authorized to approve disclosure of identifiable records or record information for research purposes.

No research professional who has established an individually identifiable research record from record information pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, or who has established a research record from data or information voluntarily provided by a treatment facility under a written confidentiality assurance for the explicit purpose of research, may disclose the record in individually identifiable form unless:

The person to whom the research record pertains or the person’s legal representative has given prior informed written consent for the disclosure;

The research organization reasonably believes that disclosure will prevent or minimize injury to a person and the disclosure is limited to information necessary to protect the person who has been or may be injured, and the research organization reports the disclosure only to the person involved or the person’s guardian, the person’s physician and the department;

The research record is disclosed in individually identifiable form for the purposes of auditing or evaluating a research program and:

The audit or evaluation is authorized or required by federal or state law or regulation or is based upon an explicit provision in a research contract, grant or other written research agreement; and

No subsequent disclosure of the research record in individually identifiable form will be made by the auditor or evaluator except as provided in this section; or

The research record is furnished in compliance with a search warrant or court order, provided that:

The court issues the search warrant or judicial subpoena concerning the research record solely for the purpose of facilitating inquiry into an alleged violation of law by the research organization using the record for a research purpose or by the agency; and

Any research record obtained pursuant to this paragraph and any information directly or indirectly derived from the research record shall remain confidential to the extent possible and shall not be used as evidence in an administrative or judicial proceeding except against the research organization using the record for a research purpose or against the department.

Unauthorized disclosure, whether willful or negligent, by a research organization that has obtained an individually identifiable record or record information from the department or a treatment facility pursuant to subsection (b) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both. All fines and penalties collected under this section shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

. A patient, or in the case of a minor or legally incompetent person, the person’s legal representative, may maintain a civil action for damages for unauthorized disclosure of protected health information against any person or entity making such an unauthorized disclosure.

Nothing in W.S.

9-2-125

or

9-2-126

shall require the department to provide client registration records or client treatment records in a format that is not within the technological capabilities of the department at the time the request is made for such records.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 76, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 76, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 21, 2007.